Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3804
Agricultural product or commodity, defined.

Agricultural product or commodity shall include all products resulting from the conduct of farming or ranching activities, dairying, beekeeping, aquaculture, insect production, poultry or egg production, or comparable activities, and any byproducts resulting from such activities.

Laws 1979, LB 538, § 4;

Laws 1987, LB 561, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 19.